Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201013-3004
Peace officer; exercise of rights;
no retaliation.

No
peace officer of any municipality or county may be discharged, subject to
disciplinary action, or threatened with discharge or disciplinary action as
retaliation for or solely by reason of the peace officer's exercise of his
or her rights provided in section 17-107, 17-208, or 23-1734 or sections 13-3001
to 13-3004. This section does not apply to any municipality or county accredited
through the Commission on Accreditation for Law Enforcement Agencies.

Laws 2009, LB158, § 7.